California, session 20252026, AB1936.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12901 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:12901. (a) The commissioner shall be a person competent and fully qualified to perform the duties of the office. Neither the commissioner nor any deputy or employee shall(b) The commissioner, a deputy, or an employee shall not, during the commissioner’s, deputy’s, or employee’s tenure of office office, be an officer, agent, or employee of an insurer or directly or indirectly interested in any an insurer or licensee under this code, except (a) as a policyholder or (b) by virtue of relationship by blood or marriage to any as either of the following:(1) A policyholder.(2) A spouse or blood relative of a person interested in any an insurer or licensee. If(c) If the commissioner or any deputy or commissioner, a deputy, or an employee holds any a license or permit issued under this code, that commissioner, deputy, or employee shall surrender it for cancellation within 10 days after appointment and qualification. Upon termination of the commissioner’s, deputy’s, or employee’s office or employment, that license or permit shall be reissued for the balance of the then current license or permit year without fee or penalty.(d) Within 10 years before election, the commissioner shall have had at least 5 years of experience as either of the following:(1) A manager or supervisor in the private sector working full time in areas within the department’s subject matter jurisdiction.(2) A senior examiner or senior employee of a state or federal agency with regulatory responsibility over insurers or insurance agencies.